Washington statutes.
RCW 7.07.050

Exceptions to privilege.

(1) There is no privilege under RCW 7.07.030 for a mediation communication that is:

(a) In an agreement evidenced by a record signed by all parties to the agreement;

(b) Made during a session of a mediation which is open, or is required by law to be open, to the public;

(c) A threat or statement of a plan to inflict bodily injury or commit a crime of violence;

(d) Intentionally used to plan a crime, attempt to commit or commit a crime, or to conceal an ongoing crime or ongoing criminal activity;

(e) Sought or offered to prove or disprove a claim or complaint of professional misconduct or malpractice filed against a mediator;

(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, sought or offered to prove or disprove a claim or complaint of professional misconduct or malpractice filed against a mediation party, nonparty participant, or representative of a party based on conduct occurring during a mediation; or

(g) Sought or offered to prove or disprove abuse, neglect, abandonment, or exploitation in a proceeding in which a child or adult protective services agency is a party, unless the public agency participates in the child or adult protection mediation.

(2) There is no privilege under RCW 7.07.030 if a court finds, after a hearing in camera, that the party seeking discovery or the proponent of the evidence has shown that the evidence is not otherwise available, that there is a need for the evidence that substantially outweighs the interest in protecting confidentiality, and that the mediation communication is sought or offered in:

(a) A criminal court proceeding involving a felony; or

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a proceeding to prove a claim to rescind or reform or a defense to avoid liability on a contract arising out of the mediation.

(3) A mediator may not be compelled to provide evidence of a mediation communication referred to in subsection (1)(f) or (2)(b) of this section.

(4) If a mediation communication is not privileged under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, only the portion of the communication necessary for the application of the exception from nondisclosure may be admitted. Admission of evidence under subsection (1) or (2) of this section does not render the evidence, or any other mediation communication, discoverable or admissible for any other purpose.

(5) Records of mediation communications that are privileged under this chapter are exempt from the requirements of chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2006 c 209 s 1; 2005 c 172 s 6.]

NOTES: